Wyoming, session 2025, SF0125.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 8-1-110 is created to read:
8-1-110. Definition of health care; rules of
construction; purposes; legislative findings; definitions.
(a) For purposes of interpretation and construction
under the Wyoming constitution and all statutes of this
state, abortion, as defined in W.S. 35-6-122(a)(i), is not
health care. For purposes of this section, actions
specified in W.S. 35-6-124 shall be construed as health
care in addition to the following exceptions:
(i) Performing a pre-viability separation
procedure necessary in the physician's reasonable medical
judgment to prevent the death of the pregnant woman, a
substantial risk of death for the pregnant woman because of
a physical condition or the serious and permanent
impairment of a life-sustaining organ of the pregnant
woman, provided that no separation procedure shall be
deemed necessary under this paragraph unless the physician
makes all reasonable medical efforts under the
circumstances to preserve both the life of the pregnant
woman and the life of the unborn baby in a manner
consistent with reasonable medical judgment;
1

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0125
ENROLLED ACT NO. 92, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(ii) Providing medical treatment to a pregnant
woman that results in the accidental or unintentional
injury to, or the death of, an unborn baby;
(iii) Performing an abortion on a woman when the
pregnancy is the result of incest as defined by W.S.
6-4-402 or sexual assault as defined by W.S. 6-2-301(a)(v).
Prior to the performance of any abortion under this
paragraph the woman, or the woman's parent or guardian if
the woman is a minor or subject to a guardianship, shall
report the act of incest or sexual assault to a law
enforcement agency and a copy of the report shall be
provided to the physician; or
(iv) Performing an abortion on a woman when, in
the physician's reasonable medical judgment, there is a
substantial likelihood that the unborn baby has a lethal
fetal anomaly or the pregnancy is determined to be a molar
pregnancy.
(b) The legislature finds that:
(i) As a consequence of an unborn baby being a
member of the species homo sapiens from conception, an
unborn baby is a member of the human race under article 1,
section 2 of the Wyoming constitution;
(ii) The legislature acknowledges that all
members of the human race are created equal and are endowed
by their creator with certain unalienable rights, the
foremost of which is the right to life;
(iii) This act promotes and furthers article 1,
section 6 of the Wyoming constitution, which guarantees
2

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0125
ENROLLED ACT NO. 92, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
that no person may be deprived of life or liberty without
due process of law;
(iv) Regarding article 1, section 38 of the
Wyoming constitution, abortion as defined in this act is
not health care. Abortion is the termination of the life of
an unborn baby. It is within the authority of the state of
Wyoming to determine reasonable and necessary restrictions
upon abortion, including its prohibition. In accordance
with article 1, section 38(c) of the Wyoming constitution,
the legislature determines that the health and general
welfare of the people requires the prohibition of abortion
as defined in this act;
(v) The legislature, in the exercise of its
constitutional duties and powers, has a fundamental duty to
provide equal protection to all human lives, including
unborn babies from conception;
(vi) Wyoming's "legitimate interests include
respect for the preservation of prenatal life at all stages
of development; the protection of maternal health and
safety; the elimination of particularly gruesome or
barbaric medical procedures; the preservation of integrity
of the medical profession; the mitigation of fetal pain;
and the prevention of discrimination on the basis of race,
sex or disability." Dobbs v. Jackson Women's Health Org.,
142 S. Ct. 2228, 2284 (2022) (internal citations omitted);
(vii) The legislature recognizes the need to
protect the health and general welfare of the people of
Wyoming. In accordance with this purpose, the definition
and rules specified in this section are provided to advance
the health, welfare and safety of all people in Wyoming.
3

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0125
ENROLLED ACT NO. 92, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(c) As used in this act:
(i) "Abortion" means the act of using or
prescribing any instrument, medicine, drug or any other
substance, device or means with the intent to terminate the
clinically diagnosable pregnancy of a woman, including the
elimination of one (1) or more unborn babies in a
multifetal pregnancy, with knowledge that the termination
by those means will, with reasonable likelihood, cause the
death of the unborn baby. "Abortion" shall not include any
use, prescription or means specified in this paragraph if
the use, prescription or means are done with the intent to:
(A) Save the life or preserve the health of
the unborn baby;
(B) Save the life or preserve the health of
the pregnant woman;
(C) Remove a dead unborn baby caused by a
spontaneous abortion or intrauterine fetal demise;
(D) Treat a woman for an ectopic pregnancy;
(E) Treat a pregnant woman for cancer or
another disease that requires medical treatment which
treatment may be fatal or harmful to the unborn baby.
(ii) "Ectopic pregnancy" means a pregnancy that
occurs when a fertilized egg implants and grows outside the
main cavity of the uterus;
(iii) "Lethal fetal anomaly" means a fetal
condition diagnosed before birth and if the pregnancy
4

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0125
ENROLLED ACT NO. 92, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
results in a live birth there is a substantial likelihood
of death of the child within hours of the child's birth;
(iv) "Molar pregnancy" means the development of
a tumor or cyst that may or may not include placental
tissue from trophoblastic cells after fertilization of an
egg that results in spontaneous abortion or intrauterine
fetal demise;
(v) "Pregnant" means the human female
reproductive condition of having a living unborn baby or
human being within a human female's body throughout the
entire embryonic and fetal stages of the unborn human being
from fertilization, when a fertilized egg has implanted in
the wall of the uterus, to full gestation and childbirth;
(vi) "Reasonable medical judgment" means a
medical judgment that would be made by a reasonably prudent
physician who is knowledgeable about the case and the
treatment possibilities with respect to the medical
conditions involved;
(vii) "Unborn baby" or "unborn human being"
means an individual living member of the species homo
sapiens throughout the entire embryonic and fetal stages
from fertilization to full gestation and childbirth.
5

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0125
ENROLLED ACT NO. 92, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
Section 2.
(a) This act is effective on the earlier of:
(i) March 12, 2026; or
(ii) The date on which the Wyoming supreme court
renders a decision on the constitutionality of the Life is
a Human Right Act, W.S. 35-6-120 through 35-6-138. On the
date on which the Wyoming supreme court renders a decision
in the matter specified in this paragraph, the attorney
general shall certify this date to the secretary of state.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the Senate.
Chief Clerk
6